Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1102.01
Accredited dental assisting program, defined.

Accredited dental assisting program means a program that is accredited by the American Dental Association Commission on Dental Accreditation, which is an agency recognized by the United States Department of Education as an accrediting body, that is within a school or college approved by the board, and that requires a dental assisting curriculum of not less than one academic year.

Laws 2017, LB18, § 3.